Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-222
Unsolicited consumer telephone call, defined.

Unsolicited consumer telephone call means a consumer telephone call other than a call made:

(1) In response to an express request of the person called;

(2) Primarily in connection with an existing debt or contract, for which payment or performance has not been completed at the time of such a call;

(3) To any person with whom the seller has a clearly established business relationship; or

(4) By a magazine or newspaper publisher or such publisher's agent or employee in connection with such publisher's business.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 84.